Tennessee, session 114, SB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR) shall conduct a study on the creation of a medical cannabis program in this state. The
study must include:
(1) The process for implementing a medical cannabis program; and
(2) The operational readiness of state and local governmental entities to support
a medical marijuana program.
SECTION 2. All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required in subsection (a) upon the request of the executive
director of TACIR.
SECTION 3. On or before November 1, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings to
members of the general assembly.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1603
010875
- 1 -